Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 1. System of Public Schools; General Provisions.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 21.

§ 22.1-1.
(For Expiration Date, see Acts 2022, cc. 549, 550, cl. 2) Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Board”
or

“State Board”

means the Board of Education.

“Department”
means the Department of Education.

“Division superintendent”
means the division superintendent of schools of a school division.

“Elementary”
includes kindergarten.

“Elementary and secondary”
and

“elementary or secondary”

include elementary, middle, and high school grades.

“Governing body”
or

“local governing body”

means the board of supervisors of a county, council of a city, or council of a town, responsible for appropriating funds for such locality, as the context may require.

“Middle school”
means separate schools for early adolescents and the middle school grades that might be housed at elementary or high schools.

“Parent”
or

“parents”

means any parent, guardian, legal custodian, or other person having control or charge of a child.

“Person of school age”
means a person who will have reached his fifth birthday on or before September 30 of the school year and who has not reached twenty years of age on or before August 1 of the school year.

“School board”
means the school board that governs a school division.

“Superintendent”
means the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

History.

1980, c. 559; 1985, c. 407; 1991, c. 178; 1995, c. 852; 2000, c. 629; 2001, c. 828; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

Cross references.

For constitutional authority to establish and maintain public free schools, see Va. Const., Art. VIII, § 1 et seq.

For requirement that applications for issuance and renewal of occupational licenses and registrations include the applicant’s social security number or a control number issued pursuant to §

46.2-342

, and provision for suspension of such license or registration for delinquency in support obligations, see §

63.2-1937

.

Transition provisions.

At its regular session of 1977, the General Assembly directed the Code Commission to make a study of the laws governing public elementary and secondary education in the Commonwealth and to recommend to the House Education Committee and the Senate Education and Health Committee such legislation as the members of the Commission should deem advisable or necessary. In January of 1980, the Commission sent to the Governor and General Assembly its report containing a proposed revision of Title 22, Education. This report, which was published as House Document No. 21 of the 1980 session, contains reviser’s notes and other explanatory matter which, while valuable, are too lengthy for inclusion here. The Commission’s draft of the revision of Title 22, as amended by the General Assembly, became c. 559 of the Acts of 1980. Effective Oct. 1, 1980, it repeals Title 22 and enacts in lieu thereof a new Title 22.1.

In addition to its revision by c. 559, former Title 22 was also amended by certain other acts passed at the 1980 session. As required by § 30-152, the Code Commission has incorporated these amendments into new Title 22.1.

Some of the cases cited in the notes under the various sections of this title were decided under corresponding provisions of former Title 22 and earlier statutes.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, cc. 891 and 895, cl. 1, as amended by Acts 2003, c. 902, cls. 1 and 2, provides: “Posting of certain statement in the public schools.

“All school boards in Virginia shall prominently post (i) the Bill of Rights of the Constitution of the United States; and (ii) the statement, ‘ “In God We Trust,” the National Motto, enacted by Congress in 1956’, in a conspicuous place in each of their schools for all students to read.

“The Office of the Attorney General shall intervene on behalf of local school boards and shall provide legal defense of the provisions of this section.”

Acts 2002, cc. 891 and 895, cl. 2 provides: “That school boards, at their discretion, may accept contributions in cash or in-kind from any person, as defined in § 1-13.19 [see now §

1-230

], to defray the costs of implementing this provision.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 9, effective October 21, 2020, provides: “Each school board, as that term is defined in § 22.1-1 of the Code of Virginia, shall post in a publicly accessible and conspicuous location on its website the plan outlining its strategies for mitigating the spread and public health risk of the COVID-19 virus, consistent with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and Virginia Department of Health mitigation recommendations, that the school board is required to submit to the Department of Education before reopening schools in accordance with Phase II and III guidelines pursuant to the June 8, 2020, order of the State Health Commissioner.”

Acts
2022, cc. 549 and
550, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective beginning with the 2024-2025 school year.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 629 added the paragraph defining “ ‘Governing body’ or ‘local governing body’ .”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 828 rewrote the definition of “Governing body or local governing body,” which had read: “ ‘Governing body’ or ‘local governing body’ means the governing body of the county, city, or town responsible for appropriating funds for such locality.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in the introductory language, substituted “a different meaning” for “otherwise or it is otherwise specifically provided” and added the definitions for “Department” and “Superintendent.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 549 and 550 are identical, and added the “Evidence-based literacy instruction” and “Science-based reading research” definitions.

Law Review.

For comment, “ ‘Working to the Contract’ in Virginia: Legal Consequences of Teachers’ Attempts to Limit Their Contractual Duties,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 449 (1982).

For comment on student rights in Virginia public schools, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (1988).

For note, “School Choice and State Constitutions,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 117 (2000).

For a note, “ ‘If We Recant, Would We Qualify?’: Exclusion of Religious Providers from State Social Service Voucher Programs,” see 56 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1291 (1999).

For an article, “The Supreme Court and Public Schools,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1335 (2000).

For article surveying developments in education law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 89 (2002).

Research References.

Education Law (Matthew Bender). Chapter 1 Education, Law and the Attorney. § 1.01 American Education. Rapp.

§ 22.1-1.
(For Effective Date, see Acts 2022, cc. 549, 550, cl. 2) Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Board”
or

“State Board”

means the Board of Education.

“Department”
means the Department of Education.

“Division superintendent”
means the division superintendent of schools of a school division.

“Elementary”
includes kindergarten.

“Elementary and secondary”
and

“elementary or secondary”

include elementary, middle, and high school grades.

“Evidence-based literacy instruction”
means structured instructional practices, including sequential, systematic, explicit, and cumulative teaching, that (i) are based on reliable, trustworthy, and valid evidence consistent with science-based reading research; (ii) are used in core or general instruction, supplemental instruction, intervention services, and intensive intervention services; (iii) have a demonstrated record of success in adequately increasing students’ reading competency, vocabulary, oral language, and comprehension and in building mastery of the foundational reading skills of phonological and phonemic awareness, alphabetic principle, phonics, spelling, and text reading fluency; and (iv) are able to be differentiated in order to meet the individual needs of students.

“Governing body”
or

“local governing body”

means the board of supervisors of a county, council of a city, or council of a town, responsible for appropriating funds for such locality, as the context may require.

“Middle school”
means separate schools for early adolescents and the middle school grades that might be housed at elementary or high schools.

“Parent”
or

“parents”

means any parent, guardian, legal custodian, or other person having control or charge of a child.

“Person of school age”
means a person who will have reached his fifth birthday on or before September 30 of the school year and who has not reached twenty years of age on or before August 1 of the school year.

“School board”
means the school board that governs a school division.

“Science-based reading research”
means research that (i) applies rigorous, systematic, and objective observational or experimental procedures to obtain valid knowledge relevant to reading development, reading instruction, and reading and writing difficulties and (ii) explains how proficient reading and writing develop, why some children have difficulties developing key literacy skills, and how schools can best assess and instruct early literacy, including the use of evidence-based literacy instruction practices to promote reading and writing achievement.

“Superintendent” means the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

History.

1980, c. 559; 1985, c. 407; 1991, c. 178; 1995, c. 852; 2000, c. 629; 2001, c. 828; 2020, cc. 860, 861; 2022, cc. 549, 550.

§ 22.1-2.
System of free public elementary and secondary schools to be maintained; administration.

There shall be a system of free public elementary and secondary schools established and maintained as provided in this title and administered by the Board of Education, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, division superintendents and school boards.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 22-1.1, 22-2; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 100; 1976, cc. 681, 713; 1978, c. 518; 1980, c. 559.

Law Review.

For comment on student rights in Virginia public schools, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (1988).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 4.

§ 22.1-2.1.
Provision of in-person instruction.

As used in this section, “in-person instruction” means instructional interaction between teachers and students that occurs in person and in real time. “In-person instruction” does not include the act of proctoring remote online learning in a classroom.

Except as otherwise permitted in subdivision C 4 of § 22.1-98 or Article 3 (§ 22.1-276.01 et seq.) of Chapter 14, each school board shall offer in-person instruction to each student enrolled in the local school division in a public elementary and secondary school for at least the minimum number of required annual instructional hours and to each student enrolled in the local school division in a public school-based early childhood care and education program for the entirety of the instructional time provided pursuant to such program.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or any regulation, rule, or policy implemented by a school board, school division, school official, or other state or local authority, the parent of any child enrolled in a public elementary or secondary school, or in any school-based early childhood care and education program, may elect for such child to not wear a mask while on school property. A parent making such an election shall not be required to provide a reason or any certification of the child’s health or education status. No student shall suffer any adverse disciplinary or academic consequences as a result of this parental election. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the Governor’s authority under Chapter 3.2 (§ 44-146.13 et seq.) of Title 44 to accomplish the purposes of such chapter with regard to a communicable disease of public health threat as defined in § 44-146.16.

History.

2022, cc. 2, 780.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 2, cl. 2 provides: “That each local school division must comply with the provisions of subsection C of
§ 22.1-2.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, no later than March 1, 2022.”

Effective date.

This section is effective February 16, 2022.

§ 22.1-3.
Persons to whom public schools shall be free.

The public schools in each school division shall be free to each person of school age who resides within the school division. Every person of school age shall be deemed to reside in a school division:

When the person is living with a natural parent or a parent by legal adoption;

When, in accordance with the provisions of §

22.1-360

, the person is living with a noncustodial parent or other person standing in loco parentis, not solely for school purposes, pursuant to a Special Power of Attorney executed under 10 U.S.C. § 1044b by the custodial parent;

When the parents of such person are dead and the person is living with a person in loco parentis who actually resides within the school division;

When the parents of such person are unable to care for the person and the person is living, not solely for school purposes, with another person who resides in the school division and is (i) the court-appointed guardian, or has legal custody, of the person; (ii) acting in loco parentis pursuant to placement of the person for adoption by a person or entity authorized to do so under §

63.2-1200

; or (iii) an adult relative providing temporary kinship care as that term is defined in §

63.2-100

. Local school divisions may require one or both parents and the relative providing kinship care to submit signed, notarized affidavits (a) explaining why the parents are unable to care for the person, (b) detailing the kinship care arrangement, and (c) agreeing that the kinship care provider or the parent will notify the school within 30 days of when the kinship care arrangement ends, as well as a power of attorney authorizing the adult relative to make educational decisions regarding the person. A school division may also require the parent or adult relative to obtain written verification from the local department of social services where the parent or parents live, or from both that department and the department of social services where the kinship provider lives, that the kinship arrangement serves a legitimate purpose that is in the best interest of the person other than school enrollment. With written consent from the parent or adult relative, for the purposes of expediting enrollment, a school division may obtain such written verification directly from the local department or departments of social services. The verification process shall be consistent with confidentiality provisions of Article 5 (§ 22.1-287 et seq.) of Chapter 14 of this title and Chapter 1 (§

63.2-100

et seq.) of Title 63.2. If the kinship care arrangement lasts more than one year, a school division may require continued verification directly from one or both departments of social services as to why the parents are unable to care for the person and that the kinship care arrangement serves a legitimate purpose other than school enrollment. A local school division may enroll a person living with a relative in a kinship care arrangement that has not been verified by a local department of social services;

When the person is living in the school division not solely for school purposes, as an emancipated minor;

When all or any portion of the building in which such person resides (i) with another person as set forth in subdivisions 1 through 4 or (ii) as an emancipated minor as set forth in subdivision 5 is taxable by the locality in which the school division is located; or

When the person living in the school division is a homeless child or youth, as set forth in this subdivision, who lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence. Such persons shall include (i) children and youths, including unaccompanied youths who are not in the physical custody of their parents, who (a) are sharing the housing of other persons due to loss of housing, economic hardship, or a similar reason; are living in motels, hotels, trailer parks, or camping grounds due to lack of alternative adequate accommodations or in emergency or transitional shelters; or are abandoned in hospitals; (b) have a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings; or (c) are living in parked cars, parks, public spaces, abandoned buildings, substandard housing, bus or train stations, or similar settings; and (ii) migratory children, as defined in the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, P.L. 89-10, as amended, who are deemed homeless as they are living in circumstances set forth in clause (i).School divisions shall comply with the requirements of Subtitle VII-B of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act, as amended (42 U.S.C. § 11431 et seq.), to ensure that homeless children and youths shall receive the educational services comparable to those offered to other public school students.School divisions serving the students identified in this subdivision shall coordinate the identification and provision of services to such students with relevant local social services agencies and other agencies and programs providing services to such students, and with other school divisions as may be necessary to resolve interdivisional issues.

In the interest of providing educational continuity to the children of military personnel, no child of a person on active military duty:

Who is attending a school free of charge in accordance with this section shall be charged tuition by that school division upon such child’s relocation to military housing located in another school division in the Commonwealth, pursuant to orders received by such child’s parent to relocate to base housing. Such children shall be allowed to continue attending school in the school division they attended immediately prior to the relocation and shall not be charged tuition for attending such school;

Who is attending a school free of charge in accordance with this section shall be charged tuition by that school division upon such child’s relocation pursuant to orders received by such child’s parent to relocate to a new duty station or to be deployed. Such children shall be allowed to remain enrolled in the current school division free of tuition through the end of the school year; and

Who is eligible to attend school free of charge in accordance with this section shall be charged tuition by a school division that will be the child’s school division of residence once his service member parent is relocated pursuant to orders received. Such a child shall be allowed to enroll in the school division of the child’s intended residence if documentation is provided, at the time of enrollment, of military orders of the service member parent or an official letter from the service member’s command indicating such relocation. Documentation indicating a permanent address within the school division shall be provided to the school division within 120 days of a child’s enrollment or tuition may be charged, including tuition for the days since the child’s enrollment in school. In the event that the child’s service member parent is ordered to relocate before the 120th day following the child’s enrollment, the school division shall not charge tuition. Students eligible to enroll in a school division pursuant to this subdivision may register, remotely or in-person, for courses and other academic programs and participate in the lottery process for charter schools and college partnership laboratory schools in the school division in which such student will reside at the same time and in the same manner as students who reside in the local school division. The assignment of the school such child will attend shall be determined by the local school division.Such children as listed in subdivisions 1, 2, and 3 shall be counted in the average daily membership of the school division in which they are enrolled. Further, the school division in which such children are enrolled subsequent to their relocation to base housing shall not be responsible for providing for their transportation to and from school.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-218; 1954, c. 638; 1958, c. 628; 1968, c. 178; 1972, c. 245; 1976, cc. 681, 713; 1978, c. 518; 1980, cc. 559, 576; 1981, cc. 341, 342; 1993, c. 903; 1997, c. 826; 1999, cc. 368, 988; 2000, cc. 209, 830; 2004, cc. 500, 967; 2006, c. 188; 2012, cc. 29, 103, 476, 507; 2013, c. 779; 2016, c. 388; 2018, cc. 394, 594; 2019, cc. 62, 404, 586.

Editor’s note.

Pursuant to § 30-152, the Code Commission has given effect in this section as set out above to the amendment to former § 22-218 in Acts 1980, c. 576.

Acts 2013, c. 779, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on June 30, 2016.” Amendments by Acts 2013, c. 779 have expired, however amendments by Acts 2016, c. 388 made many of the same changes.

Acts 2019, c. 586, cl. 2 provides: “That (i) each student who resides on property that is located in more than one school division and who registers for enrollment at a public school in one such local school division prior to July 1, 2019, and (ii) any sibling of any such student shall be deemed to reside in such local school division and is eligible to attend public school in such local school division for free.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 368, in subdivision 3, inserted “either (i),” and added “or (ii) acting in loco parentis pursuant to placement of the person for adoption by a person or entity authorized to do so under § 63.1-220.1.”

The 1999 amendment by c. 988 added the last paragraph.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 209 deleted “or” at the end of subdivision 4, added “or” at the end of subdivision 5, added subdivision 6, substituted “subsection 4” for “this section” in the next-to-last paragraph, and rewrote the last paragraph.

The 2000 amendment by c. 830 substituted “§ 63.1-219.8” for “§ 63.1-220.1” at the end of subdivision 3.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 500 deleted subdivision 4, which formerly read: “When the person is living with a parent, guardian, or person in loco parentis in a temporary shelter in the school division, not solely for school purposes”; and in subdivision 6, rewrote the first paragraph, in the third paragraph, inserted “clause (i) of” near the beginning, and added the next-to-last and last paragraphs.

The 2004 amendment by c. 967 added present subdivision 2; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 188 inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 29 and 103 are identical, and rewrote subdivision A 2.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and in the second sentence of subdivision A 6, substituted “individuals with mental illness” for “the mentally ill” in clause (b), and deleted “of this subdivision” at the end.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 779, expires June 30, 2016, and substituted “under 10 U.S.C. § 1044b by” for “under Title 10, United States Code, § 1044b, by” in subdivision A 2; in subdivision A 4 added clause (iii) and the last six sentences; and in subdivision A 6, inserted “federal” preceding, and “P.L. 89-10,” following “Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965,” near the end of the first paragraph, and substituted clause designators (a) and (2) for (i) and (ii) in the second paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 388, in subdivision A 4, added clause (iii) in the first sentence and added the last six sentences; in subdivision A 6, inserted “federal” and “P.L. 89-10” in the first paragraph and redesignated clauses (i) and (ii) as (1) and (2) in the second paragraph; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 394, rewrote subdivision A 6, deleted the former two paragraphs following subdivision 6, which defined “temporary shelter” and residence determination of a person residing in a temporary shelter, respectively, and updated the federal reference in the first undesignated paragraph.

The 2018 amendment by c. 594 redesignated former subsection B as subsection B and subdivision B 1; in subdivision B 1, in the first sentence, added “Who is” at the beginning and deleted “and forfeit his military housing allowance” at the end of the first sentence; added subdivisions B 2 and B 3; and in the last paragraph in subsection B inserted “as listed in subdivisions 1, 2, and 3” in the first sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 62 and 404 are identical, and in subdivision B 3, inserted the fifth sentence.

The 2019 amendment by c. 586 added subdivision A 6; redesignated former subdivision A 6 as subdivision A 7; and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For comment on student rights in Virginia public schools, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (1988).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

For 2003/2004 survey of education law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 183 (2004).

For annual survey article, “Education Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 103 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, §§ 21, 28.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

False information relating to residency. —

A locality does not have the authority to enact an ordinance imposing a civil or criminal penalty against a parent enrolling a child based on false information that indicates the parent and child are residents of the local government, or to enact an ordinance holding a parent liable for the tuition or educational costs in such a situation. See opinion of Attorney General to Delegate M. Kirkland Cox, 04-094, 2005 Va. AG LEXIS 10 (4/7/05).

The categories in this section are not exclusive,

therefore, a school district may not refuse to provide free education to a bona fide resident of the school division based solely on the categories in the section. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable, Frank D. Hargrove, Sr., Member, House of Delegates, 07-015, 2007 Va. AG LEXIS 18 (6/14/07).

Transportation to special program. —

A local school board may not charge a fee for the transportation of a student enrolled in a specialty program located outside the boundaries of the student’s base school. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jackson H. Miller, Member, House of Delegates, 10-016, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 24 (3/18/10).

County school board is solely responsibility for school consolidation. —

Local school board cannot impose a mandatory fee on students taking advanced placement courses for the required taking of the Advanced Placement Examination. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable David W. Marsden, Member, Senate of Virginia, 10-121, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 9 (01/28/11).

§ 22.1-3.1.
Birth certificates required upon admission; required notice to the local law-enforcement agency.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no pupil shall be admitted for the first time to any public school in any school division in this Commonwealth unless the person enrolling the pupil shall present, upon admission, a certified copy of the pupil’s birth record. The principal or his designee shall record the official state birth number from the pupil’s birth record into the pupil’s permanent school record and may retain a copy in the pupil’s permanent school record. If a certified copy of the pupil’s birth record cannot be obtained, the person so enrolling the pupil shall submit an affidavit setting forth the pupil’s age and explaining the inability to present a certified copy of the birth record. If the school division cannot ascertain a child’s age because of the lack of a birth certificate, the child shall nonetheless be admitted into the public schools if the division superintendent determines that the person submitting the affidavit presents information sufficient to estimate with reasonable certainty the age of such child.However, if the student seeking enrollment is a homeless child or youth as defined in § 22.1-3, the school shall immediately enroll such student, even if such student is unable to produce the records required for enrollment, and shall immediately contact the school last attended by the student to obtain relevant academic and other records, and shall comply with the provisions of Subtitle VII-B of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act, as amended (42 U.S.C. § 11431 et seq.), including immediately referring the parent of the student or the youth to the local school division liaison, as described in the federal Act, who shall assist in obtaining the necessary records for enrollment.

Upon the failure of any person enrolling a pupil to present a certified copy of the pupil’s birth record, the principal of the school in which the pupil is being enrolled or his designee shall immediately notify the local law-enforcement agency. The notice to the local law-enforcement agency shall include copies of the submitted proof of the pupil’s identity and age and the affidavit explaining the inability to produce a certified copy of the birth record.

Within 14 days after enrolling a transferred pupil, the principal of the school in which the pupil has been enrolled or his designee shall request that the principal or his designee of the school in which the pupil was previously enrolled submit documentation that a certified copy of the pupil’s birth record was presented upon the pupil’s initial enrollment.

Principals and their designees shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability in connection with any notice to a local law-enforcement agency of a pupil lacking a birth certificate or failure to give such notice as required by this section.

History.

1990, c. 295; 1991, c. 523; 2004, c. 500; 2007, c. 49; 2018, c. 394.

Cross references.

As to accepting children for placement in homes, facilities, etc., by local boards, see §

63.2-900

.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 500, in subsection A, added “Except as otherwise provided in this subsection” at the beginning of the first sentence in the first paragraph and added the last paragraph; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 49 inserted “and may retain a copy in the pupil’s permanent school record” to the end of the second sentence in subsection A.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 394 substituted “of Subtitle VII-B of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act” for “of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Education Assistance Improvements Act of 2001” in the second paragraph of subsection A.

§ 22.1-3.2.
Notice of student’s school status required as condition of admission; penalty.

Prior to admission to any public school of the Commonwealth, a school board shall require the parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of a child of school age to provide, upon registration:

A sworn statement or affirmation indicating whether the student has been expelled from school attendance at a private school or in a public school division of the Commonwealth or in another state for an offense in violation of school board policies relating to weapons, alcohol or drugs, or for the willful infliction of injury to another person. This document shall be maintained as a part of the student’s scholastic record.

A sworn statement or affirmation indicating whether the student has been found guilty of or adjudicated delinquent for any offense listed in subsection G of § 16.1-260 or any substantially similar offense under the laws of any state, the District of Columbia, or the United States or its territories. This document shall be maintained as provided in § 22.1-288.2.

When the child is registered as a result of a foster care placement as defined in §

63.2-100

, the information required under this section shall be furnished by the local social services agency or licensed child-placing agency that made the foster care placement.

Any person making a materially false statement or affirmation shall be guilty upon conviction of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1993, c. 889; 2006, cc. 53, 183.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 53 and 183 are identical, and inserted the subdivision A 1 and subsection C designations; in subdivision A 1, added the second sentence; added subdivision A 2 and subsection B; deleted the last sentence of subsection C, which read: “The registration document shall be maintained as a part of the student’s scholastic record”; and made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

§ 22.1-3.3.
Transfer of students under certain circumstances.

Whenever any student has been the victim of any crime against the person pursuant to Chapter 4 (§

18.2-30

et seq.) of Title 18.2, and such crime was committed by another student attending classes in the school, or by any employee of the school board, or by any volunteer, contract worker or other person who regularly performs services in the school, or if the crime was committed upon school property or on any school bus owned or operated by the school division, the student upon whom the crime was committed shall, upon written request from the student’s parent, or the student, if such student is an emancipated minor, be permitted by the relevant school board to transfer to another comparable school within the school division, if available. Any transportation services for such students shall be provided in accordance with school board policies.

For the purposes of this section, “victim” means any student who has been the victim of a crime against the person pursuant to Chapter 4 (§

18.2-30

et seq.) of Title 18.2, and who has suffered physical, psychological, or economic harm as a direct result of the commission of such crime.

History.

1997, cc. 362, 408.

Law Review.

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 23.

§ 22.1-3.4.
Enrollment of certain children placed in foster care.

Whenever a student has been placed in foster care by a local social services agency and the placing social services agency is unable to produce any of the documents required for enrollment pursuant to § 22.1-3.1, 22.1-270, or 22.1-271.2, the student shall immediately be enrolled; however, the person enrolling the student shall provide a written statement that, to the best of his knowledge, sets forth (i) the student’s age, (ii) compliance with the requirements of § 22.1-3.2, and (iii) that the student is in good health and is free from communicable or contagious disease.

The sending and receiving school divisions shall cooperate in facilitating the enrollment of any child placed in foster care across jurisdictional lines for the purpose of enhancing continuity of instruction. The child shall be allowed to continue to attend the school in which he was enrolled prior to the most recent foster care placement, upon the joint determination of the placing social services agency and the local school division that such attendance is in the best interest of the child.

In the event the student continues to attend the school in which he was enrolled prior to the most recent foster care placement, the receiving school division shall be accorded foster children education payments pursuant to § 22.1-101.1; further, the receiving school division may enter into financial arrangements with the sending school division pursuant to subsection C of § 22.1-5. Under no circumstances shall a child placed in foster care be charged tuition regardless of whether such child is attending the school in which he was enrolled prior to the most recent foster care placement or attending a school in the receiving school division.

For the purposes of subsections A, B, and C:“A child or student placed in foster care” means a pupil who is the subject of a foster care placement through an entrustment or commitment of such child to the local social services board or licensed child-placing agency pursuant to clause (ii) of the definition of “foster care placement” as set forth in §

63.2-100

.For the purposes of this section:“Receiving school division” means the school division in which the residence of the student’s foster care placement is located.“Sending school division” means the school division in which the student last attended school.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A, B, and C or § 22.1-3 or 22.1-5, no person of school age who is the subject of a foster care placement, as such term is defined in §

63.2-100

, shall be charged tuition.

The provisions of this section shall apply to any student who was in foster care upon reaching 18 years of age but who has not yet reached 22 years of age.

History.

2005, c. 343; 2011, c. 154; 2020, cc. 474, 475.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 154 rewrote the last sentence in subsection B, which read: “The sending school division and receiving school division may agree to allow the child to continue to attend the school in which he was enrolled prior to the most recent foster care placement, upon the agreement of the placing social services agency that such attendance is in the best interest of the child”; and in subsection C, substituted “In the event the student continues to attend” for “In the event the student is allowed to continue to attend.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 474 and 475 are identical, and added subsection F.

§ 22.1-4.
Repealed by
Acts 1991, c. 523.

Cross references.

For current provision relating to admission of children whose age is not ascertainable because of lack of birth certificate,
see § 22.1-3.1.